lib/dict/hyph_lt.dic
ISO8859-13
.ap1
.api1
.ap3r
.arbi1
.arti1
.as3p
.at1
.ata1
.at3r
.að3v
.dina1
.ek3r
.i2ð3
.iði2
.kirti1
.nu1
.nusi1
.pie2è
.sam1
.sida1
.sk4
.st4
.su5kr
.te3s2
.uk3
.u2ð3
.uþ1
.ás4
.ðven1
a1a2
a1b
a1c
a2ch
a1d
a4dra
a1e
ae2l
a1f
2a1g
a4gr
ag3ra
a5grio
a5gro
a1h
a5inf
ai4sk
ai4tr
a1j
a1k
ak2l
ak2vi
a2kët
a1l
a3li
a5lo1
a3ly
a3lë
a3lû
a1m
a1n
an3k2l
an4sk
an4tr
a2o
a1p
ap1a4k
ap3ei
ap3i2m
ap3l
a3pr
ap3s2
a1r
ar1eit
a4rg
ari4s
a1s
asi1
asi5s
a4sk
as3kl
a3sl
as2mi
as2mu
a5s4n
a4stu
a1t
at3aug
ate5ist
at3i2m
ato1
atp4
a4tru
at1ë2
atû2þ
a4u
au4kl
au4sk
au4sl
au4t3r
a1v
a1w
a1y
a1z
a1à
2a1è
a1æ
a1ë2
a1á
a1ð
a3ðn
að4tr
að2v
a1ø
a1û2
a1þ
aþ2l
ba3c
balta1
ba4sl
2b1b
2b1c
4b3d
bep4
be3s2
besi1
be3t2
2b1f
2b1g
2b1h
b1j
2b1k
2b1l
b2la
b2liz
3b2lo
b2lu
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p
2b2r
b3ri
2b1s
2b3t
bu4k
2b1v
2b1w
2b1z
2b1è
2b1ð
2b1þ
car4
2c1b
2c1c
2c1d
2c1f
2c1g
3chi
2c1k
2c1l
2c1m
2c1n
2c1p
2c1r
2c1s
2c1t
cu4
cuk5
2c1v
2c1w
2c1z
2c1è
2c1ð
2c1þ
da3b4
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
de4k
dema1
de4pr
de4sp
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
di4p
di4s
dis5k
2d1j
2d3k
4d3l
2d1m
2d1n
do3ri
2d1p
2d1r
dro1
dro2b
d2rë
4drø
2d1s
2d1t
du2a
du4k
du5ka
du4sl
2d1v
d3va
dvi3a
2d1w
d4z
2d1è
2d1ð
d4þ
dþio1
e1a2
e2a3l
eapi1
eat1
e1b2
ebe1
e3bl
eb3r
e1c
e2ch
e3d2
ed3ri
e4dro
ed3rë
e1e
e1f
e1g
eg3ra
e1h
e1ie
ei4k3l
1ein
ei4sk
ei4sl
2eis3t
eist2ra
ei2ð1
e1j
e1k
e3kr
e1l
e1m
ema5s4
2e1n
en3k2l
enk4la
eno1
ens4
4enta
enu1
e2o
e3or
e3o2ð
e3p
ep4li
ep4r
epra1
epri1
e1r
ere3a4
eri4s
ero1
erë2
e1s
esi5s
es4k
eska1
e5sko
e3s2v
e1t
e1u4
euþ3
e1v
e3vi
e1w
e1y
e1z
e1à
e1è
e1æ
e1ë
e1á4
eáp3
eás3k
eát3r
e1ð
e3ðn
eð2v
eðë3
e1ø
e1û
e1þ
2f1b
2f1c
2f1d
2f1f
2f1g
2f1h
fi4s5
2f1k
2f1l
2f1m
2f1n
2f1p
2f1r
fri1
2f1s
2f1t
2f1v
2f1w
2f1z
2f1è
2f1ð
2f1þ
gað3
2g1b
2g1c
2g1d
ge4o1
2g1f
2g1g
2g1h
2g1k
2g1l
g2le
g2lo
2g1m
2g1n
3g2nø
2g1p2
3g2r
grai2
g3ran
5g3re
g4rei
g3ri
4g4rio
g3ro.
g4rà
5grá
4grø
2g1s
4g1t
3gu
2g1v
2g1w
gyva1
2g1z
2g1è
2g1ð
2g1þ
2h1b
2h1c
2h1d
2h1f
2h1g
2h1h
hi4b
2h1k
2h2l
2h1m
h2me
2h1n
2h1p
2h1r
2h1s
2h1t
2h1v
2h1w
2h1z
2h1è
2h1ð
2h1þ
i2a
ia5g4
i3aið
ia3k
i3antæ
i3antë
iap4
i3ar
i3b2
i1c
ice1
i1d
id2r
id3rë
i2dëm
i2e
ie4d3r
ie3g
i3ei
ie3kl
i3ent
ie4p5r
ie4sk
i1f
2i1g
i3g2l
ig3ru
2i1h
i1i2
i1j
i1k
i3k2n
ik3r
i1l
ilo1
i1m
1imd
4i1n
in4kl
5inv
i2o
io4g3r
iok2
io4pl
i3or
i1p
i2p1j
ip3ru
i1r
ira3s2
i3ri
4i1s
i5sa
i5si
is4k
i3sl
is4li
i5s4n
i4ste
isto1
2i3t2
i2u
i1v
i1w
i1y
i1z
i2à
i1è
i1æ
i1ë2
i1á
i1ð
i3ðn
ið5t
i4ðv
iðë2
1iðð
i2ø
i2û
i3þ
3ja.
jauna1
2j1b
2j1c
2j1d
2j1f
2j1g
2j1h
2j1j
2j1k
2j1l
2j1m
2j1n
jot3
jo4tv
2j1p
2j1r
2j1s
2j1t
1ju
2j1v
2j1w
2j1z
2j1è
2j1ð
1jû
2j1þ
3ka.
5ka3d
kak3
ka4kl
ka4pr
3kar
3kas
3kati
5kav
kavar1
ka3z2
2k1b
2k1c
2k1d
3ke
ke4b3
keren1
2k1f
2k1g
2k1h
k4i
5ki.
5kia
3kib
3kil
5kit
2k1k
2k1l
3k2la
k4lan
4kle.
k2lel
4klo.
4klu.
k2ly
4klà
4klø
2k1m
2k1n
3ko
2k1p
2k2r
k4rau
kris2
kri5st
k3ro
k4rov
4k3ru
5krun
k4ry
k5rà
2k1s
k4sk
ks3l
k4s3p
4k1t
k3ta
3ku
4kub
ku4k
ku4pr
2k1v
k2va
k3vo
k2vë
2k1w
3kyt
2k1z
5kà
2k1è
2k1ð
kð2ly
kðë3
2k1þ
3la.
lap4s3to
2l1b
lb3r
2l1c
2l1d
3le.
le3c
le4gr
4leè
2l1f
2l1g
lg3s2t
2l1h
3li.
li4a
5li4o
3liø
2l1j
2l1k
lko1
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
3lo.
log4
4lop
4l1p
lpna1
2l1r
4l1s
l4sk
l4s3p
4l3t
3lu.
2lup
4l1v
2l1w
3lyè
2l1z
3là
2l1è
3læs
3lëm
3lës
2lëè
3lá4
4l1ð
3lø
2l1þ
m2a
2m3aid
3mas
mas3ki
2m1b
mb3r
2m1c
2m1d
me3c
meis1
2m1f
2m1g
2m1h
mi4gl
mi4gr
min4s
mi4tr
2m1k
2m1l
2m1m
2m1n
m2o
2mod
2m1p
m4pl
m3pr
2m1r
4m1s
2m1t
m3ta
3muo
2m1v
2m1w
2m1z
2m1è
2m1ð
2m1þ
na3s2
na3t2
2n1b
2n1c
ncen1
2n1d
n3drë
ne1
neg4
nei2m
ne4o3
neor2
nerë3
nesi1
ne3sl
ne3s2t
ne3t2
neás3t
2n1f
4n1g
ng3l
ng4r
2n1h
ni4s
2n1j
2n1k
nk3la
nk3r
n3kry
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
5no
2n1p
2n1r
4n1s
ns4ku
ns3l
n4s3p
nst3r
4n1t
n3ta
nt4pl
n3tru
nt2ruo
nua4
nu3b2
nu3g
nu1i
nuk2
nu4o3
nuos2
nu5s4
2n1v
2n1w
2n1z
4n1è
2n1ð
2n1þ
o1a
o1b
o1c
o1d
o3dr
o1e
o2et
o1f
o1g
o1h
o1i
o1j
o1k
o3kr
o1l
olen1
o1m
om4pr
o1n
ono1
o1o2
o1p
o1r
o2rie
ori4s
or4tr
o2ræ
o1s
o3sl
os3le
os4lo
o3s2v
o3t2
oto1
o1v
o1w
o1y
o1z
o1à
o1è
o1æ
o1ë
o1á
o1ð
oð2v
o1ø
o1û
o1þ
pa3
pad2
pai2l
pai2m
pai2r
3pan
pap4
p2ar
parsi1
pa4r1ë2
pas2
pa5sr
p2at2
2p1b
4p1c
4p3d2
p2e
per1
pe2re
pe2r3im
per3s
pe2rë
2p1f
2p1g
2p1h
p2i
p3ieð
2p3k2
3p2l
p3le
p3li
4plio
p4liu
p3lo
p4loj
p4lu
p4ly
2p1m
4p1n
3po
po4g
poli1
2p1p
2p2r
p3rai
prau2si
p3rað
p3ri
pris2
p5ro.
p3rom
p3ry
4prà
p3rë
p3rû
4p1s
psi1
p5s4k
p4s3ty
p3s2v
4p3t2
3p4u
pusiau1
pu4sk
pu4sl
pu4tr
2p1v
2p1w
p2y
2p1z
2p1è
p2ë
4p3ð2
4p3þ
r2a
3ra.
ra3b
3rac
ra1im
rai4tá
ra3kr
3ral
3ram
ras4l
ra3sm
rau4ka.
3rav
2r1b
rbo1
r3b4r
2r1c
4r1d
2reb
4rein
4reit
3rel
re4p5
5res
res3l
3ret
2r1f
2r1g
2r1h
r2i
3ri.
ri3d
3rij
ri3kr
2ril
ri2ma.
2r3imt
3rio
ri3p
risi1
ri3st
rivin1
3rià
3riø
2riû
4r1k
rk3ly
r3k4r
4r1l
2r1m
4r1n
r2o
3rod2
ro4gr
3roj
3rok
3ron
3rop
2r3org
5ros
2r1p
r3p4r
2r1r
4r1s
rs4ko.
rs4p
4r1t
rti5k4
rti3s2
r3t2r
r3t2v
r2u
2ruk
3rul
4run
3ruos
2rup
3rus
ru4sk
4ruto
4r1v
2r1w
2r1z
3rà
4ràs
4r1è
4r1ð
r3ð2l
r3ð2m
5rø
2r1þ
sala1
2s1amþ
san5t
sarka1
2s3b
2s1c
2s3d
s2e
se4kr
senat4
2s1f
2s1g
2s1h
si3auk
si3a2v
si3a2ð
si3d
si3k4
si3p4
si3s2
si5ð2v
3s2k2
4sk.
s5ka.
4ske
5s4ken
5ski
5s4kle
5sk4r
5skub
sk3va
sk3vi
5sky
4skà
5skæ
2s2l
3sle
s3li
s3lo
4s3lu
4s3lû
2s1m
4sme.
4smæ
4s3n
so4dr
3s2p
s3pe
4spn
4spu
4s1r
s3ri
2s1s
2s1t
s2tal
s2ten
4stin
s2tod
s2toj
3s2tov
st2rai
st2v
4stæ
4s3të
4stø
s2tû
su1
su3bl
su3d2
su3g2
suk2l
su3s2
susi1
suþ4
2s1v
s2ve
3s2vy
2s1w
2s1z
sà3
4s3è
5së
2s1ð
2s1þ
t2a
2tab
ta3kr
ta5s
2tat
taura1
2taè
2t1b
2t1c
2t1d
2teb
3tem
te4o
te3t2
2t1f
4t3g
2t1h
t2i
ti4gr
ti4k3l
3tin
2tip
4t3j
4t3k
t4kl
4t3l
4t3m
2t1n
t2o
3toje
2tolá
to3s2
2tow
2t3p
t4pj
tp3lû
tp4r
2t1r
4trio
t2rið
4tro
4trà
4trø
4t3s4
tsi1
tskri1
4t1t
tua4
3tur
2t1v
t2vo
4tvëj
2t1w
3tyd
2t1z
2t1è
3tæ
t2ëm
t3ëmu
t3ëmæ
t3ëmë
2t3ð2
2t3þ
u1a2
u3ai
u1b
u2bj
u1c
u1d
u1e2
u1f
u1g
ug4r
ug5rio
u1h
u1i2m
u5in
ui2r
u1j
u1k
u3kl
uk2le
u3kr
u3kv
u5kø
u1l
u1m
u1n
u2o
u3or
uo4sl
u3p
up4l
up3ro
u1r
urk2
ur3kl
u5ro1
ur3s2
u1s
u2s1al
u3sl
us3la
us3le
usva1
us3ve
u3t2
uto1
2utr
u1u
u1v
u1w
u1y
u1z
u1à
u1è
u1æ
u1ë2
u1á
u1ð
u3ð2l
u3ð2n
uð2v
u1ø
u1û2
u1þ
uþi2m
u3þl
uþ3v
uþ1ë2
3va.
vap4
va3t
2v1b
2v1c
2v1d
v2e
2vep
3ves
2v1f
2v1g
2v1h
viesia1
vi4s5k
vi4t3r
2v1j
2v1k
2v1l
2v1m
2v1n
2v1p
2v1r
2v4s
2v1t
2v1v
2v1w
2vydau
2v1z
3và
2v1è
3vë
4vëp
2v1ð
2v1þ
2w1b
2w1c
2w1d
2w1f
2w1g
2w1h
2w1k
2w1l
2w1m
2w1n
2w1p
2w1r
2w1s
2w1t
2w1v
2w1w
2w1z
2w1è
2w1ð
2w1þ
y1a
y1b
y1c
y1d
y1e
y1f
y1g
ygia1
y1h
y1i
y1j
y1k
y4k3l
y1l
y1m
y1n
y1o
y1p
y3r
y1s
y4sk
y1t
y1u
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z
y1à
y1è
y1æ
y1ë
y1á
y1ð
y1ø
y1û
y1þ
2z1b
2z1c
2z1d
2z1f
2z1g
2z1h
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
2z1n
2z1p
2z1r
2z1s
2z1t
2z1v
2z1w
2z1z
2z1è
2z1ð
2z1þ
à1a
à1b
à1c
à1d
à1e
à1f
à1g
à1h
à1i
à1j
à1k
à1l
à1m
à1n
à1o
à1p
à1r
à1s
à1t
à1u
à1v
à1w
à1y
à1z
à1à
à1è
à1æ
à1ë
à1á
à1ð
à1ø
à1û
à1þ
2è1b
2è1c
2è1d
èeko1
2è1f
2è1g
2è1h
èin1
2è1k
2è1l
2è1m
2è1n
2è1p
2è1r
2è1s
2è1t
2è1v
2è1w
2è1z
2è1è
2è1ð
2è1þ
æ1a
æ1b
æ1c
æ1d
æ1e
æ1f
æ1g
æ1h
æ1i
æ1j
æ1k
æ1l
æ1m
æ1n
æ1o
æ1p
æ1r
æ1s
æ1t
æ1u
æ1v
æ1w
æ1y
æ1z
æ1à
æ1è
æ1æ
æ1ë
æ1á
æ1ð
æ1ø
æ1û
æ1þ
ë1a
ë1b
ë1c
ë1d
ë1e
ë1f
ë1g
ë1h
ë1i
ë1j
ë1k
ë4k3l
2ë3l
ë1m
ë3me
ë1n
ë1o
ë1p
ë1r
2ë1s
ës3l
2ë3t
ë4tr
ë1u
ë1v
ë1w
ë1y
ë1z
ë1à
ë1è
ë1æ
ë1ë
ë1á
ë1ð
ë1ø
ë1û
ë1þ
á1a
á1b
á1c
á1d2
á2e
á1f
á4g
á1h
á1i
á1j
á2k4
á2l
á2m
á1n
á1o
á4p
á2r
á1s
ási1
ás3l
ás2m
ás2r
ást2
á2t2
á1u
á2v
á1w
á1y
á1z
á1à
á1è
á1æ
á1ë2
á1á
á1ð
á1ø
á1û
á1þ
2ð1b2
2ð1c
2ð3d2
ð1ei
ðe2v
2ð1f
2ð1g4
2ð1h
2ð5ist
ðiuk1
2ð1k2
2ð1l
ð2lij
ð2lu
3ðly
2ð1m
2ð1n
ð2ne
ðno1
ðo2r
2ð1p4
2ð1r
2ð3s4
ðsi1
ðsikap1
4ð3t2
ðu4ð
3ð1v
ð2vi
ð4vyd
2ð1w
2ð1z
4ð3è
ðë2j
2ð1ð
2ð1þ
ø1a
ø1b
ø1c
ø1d
ø1e
ø1f
ø1g
ø1h
ø1i
ø1j
ø1k
ø1l
ø1m
ø1n
ø1o
ø1p
ø1r
ø1s
ø1t
ø1u
ø1v
ø1w
ø1y
ø1z
ø1à
ø1è
ø1æ
ø1ë
ø1á
ø1ð
ø1ø
ø1û
ø1þ
û1a
û1b
û1c
û1d
û1e
û1f
û1g
û1h
û1i
û1j
û1k
û4k3l
û1l
û1m
û1n
û1o
û1p
û1r
û1s
û4s3k
ûs3l
ûs3t
û1t
û1u
û1v
û1w
û1y
û1z
û1à
û1è
û1æ
û1ë
û1á
û1ð
û1ø
û1û
û1þ
þant4
þants5
2þ3b2
2þ1c
2þ3d2
þen1
2þ3f4
2þ3g
2þ1h
þi3mu
þio3
þ1j
2þ3k2
2þ1l
þ2lu
4þ1m
2þ1n
2þ3p
2þ1r
2þ1s
þsi1
þ4sk
þ4s5l
þs3t
4þ3t2
þ2u
þu3s2
3þ2v
þ4vi
þ3vo
2þ1w
2þ1z
2þ1è
þás3
2þ1ð
2þ1þ
